trunk/incubator/apertium-pl-ru.ru.dix.xml
    <pardef n="врем/я__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>я</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ени</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ени</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>я</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>еном</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eни</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ена</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ён</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ен</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>енам</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ена</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>енами</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>енах</l>
          <r>я<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="клет/ка__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ка</l>
          <r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ки</l>
          <r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ке</l>
          <r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ку</l>
          <r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>кой</l>
          <r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ке</l>
          <r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ки</l>
          <r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ок</l>
          <r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>кам</l>
          <r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ки</l>
          <r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ками</l>
          <r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ках</l>
          <r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="д/ень__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ень</l>
          <r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ня</l>
          <r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ню</l>
          <r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ень</l>
          <r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>нём</l>
          <r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>не</l>
          <r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ни</l>
          <r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ней</l>
          <r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ням</l>
          <r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ни</l>
          <r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>нями</l>
          <r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>нях</l>
          <r>ень<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="время"><i>врем</i><par n="врем/я__n"/></e>
    <e lm="клетка"><i>клет</i><par n="клет/ка__n"/></e>
    <e lm="день"><i>д</i><par n="д/ень__n"/></e>
    <e lm="день"><i>д</i><par n="д/ень__n"/><p><l><b/>Страшного<b/>Суда</l><r><g><b/>Страшного<b/>Суда</g></r></p></e>
